SpellChecking/Dictionaries/sorbian.aff
FLAG num
SFX 0461 Y 30
SFX 0461 0 i .
SFX 0461 0 imoj .
SFX 0461 0 imy .
SFX 0461 0 itaj .
SFX 0461 0 itej .
SFX 0461 0 iće .
SFX 0461 0 ja .
SFX 0461 0 jach .
SFX 0461 0 jachmoj .
SFX 0461 0 jachmy .
SFX 0461 0 jachu .
SFX 0461 0 jacy .
SFX 0461 0 jany .
SFX 0461 0 jał .
SFX 0461 0 jała .
SFX 0461 0 jało .
SFX 0461 0 jałoj .
SFX 0461 0 jeli .
SFX 0461 0 jenje .
SFX 0461 0 jeć .
SFX 0461 0 ještaj .
SFX 0461 0 ještej .
SFX 0461 0 ješće .
SFX 0461 0 moj .
SFX 0461 0 my .
SFX 0461 0 nješ .
SFX 0461 0 nu .
SFX 0461 0 taj .
SFX 0461 0 tej .
SFX 0461 0 će .

SFX 0462 Y 26
SFX 0462 0 chmoj .
SFX 0462 0 chmy .
SFX 0462 0 chu .
SFX 0462 0 cy .
SFX 0462 0 j .
SFX 0462 0 ja .
SFX 0462 0 jtaj .
SFX 0462 0 jtej .
SFX 0462 0 jće .
SFX 0462 0 li .
SFX 0462 0 moj .
SFX 0462 0 my .
SFX 0462 0 nje .
SFX 0462 0 taj .
SFX 0462 0 tej .
SFX 0462 0 ty .
SFX 0462 0 ć .
SFX 0462 0 će .
SFX 0462 0 ł .
SFX 0462 0 ła .
SFX 0462 0 ło .
SFX 0462 0 łoj .
SFX 0462 0 še .
SFX 0462 0 štaj .
SFX 0462 0 štej .
SFX 0462 0 šće .

SFX 0463 Y 30
SFX 0463 uj owach ..
SFX 0463 uj owachmoj ..
SFX 0463 uj owachmy ..
SFX 0463 uj owachu ..
SFX 0463 uj owacy ..
SFX 0463 uj owali ..
SFX 0463 uj owanje ..
SFX 0463 uj owany ..
SFX 0463 uj ować ..
SFX 0463 uj ował ..
SFX 0463 uj owała ..
SFX 0463 uj owało ..
SFX 0463 uj owałoj ..
SFX 0463 uj owaše ..
SFX 0463 uj owaštaj ..
SFX 0463 uj owaštej ..
SFX 0463 uj owašće ..
SFX 0463 uj uja ..
SFX 0463 uj uje ..
SFX 0463 uj ujemoj ..
SFX 0463 uj ujemy ..
SFX 0463 uj ujetaj ..
SFX 0463 uj ujetej ..
SFX 0463 uj ujeće ..
SFX 0463 uj uješ ..
SFX 0463 uj ujtaj ..
SFX 0463 uj ujtej ..
SFX 0463 uj uju ..
SFX 0463 uj ujće ..
SFX 0463 uj yć ..

SFX 0464 Y 30
SFX 0464 0 a .
SFX 0464 0 acy .
SFX 0464 0 enje .
SFX 0464 0 eny .
SFX 0464 0 eć .
SFX 0464 0 i .
SFX 0464 0 ich .
SFX 0464 0 ichmoj .
SFX 0464 0 ichmy .
SFX 0464 0 ichu .
SFX 0464 0 ili .
SFX 0464 0 imoj .
SFX 0464 0 imy .
SFX 0464 0 itaj .
SFX 0464 0 itej .
SFX 0464 0 ić .
SFX 0464 0 iće .
SFX 0464 0 ił .
SFX 0464 0 iła .
SFX 0464 0 iło .
SFX 0464 0 iłoj .
SFX 0464 0 iš .
SFX 0464 0 ištaj .
SFX 0464 0 ištej .
SFX 0464 0 išće .
SFX 0464 0 my .
SFX 0464 0 taj .
SFX 0464 0 tej .
SFX 0464 0 u .
SFX 0464 0 će .

SFX 0465 Y 23
SFX 0465 0 i .
SFX 0465 0 imoj .
SFX 0465 0 imy .
SFX 0465 0 itaj .
SFX 0465 0 itej .
SFX 0465 0 iće .
SFX 0465 0 iš .
SFX 0465 0 ja .
SFX 0465 0 jacy .
SFX 0465 0 jałoj .
SFX 0465 0 jeli .
SFX 0465 0 jenje .
SFX 0465 0 jeny .
SFX 0465 0 jeć .
SFX 0465 0 jeł .
SFX 0465 0 jeła .
SFX 0465 0 jeło .
SFX 0465 0 ju .
SFX 0465 0 moj .
SFX 0465 0 my .
SFX 0465 0 taj .
SFX 0465 0 tej .
SFX 0465 0 će .

SFX 0466 Y 11
SFX 0466 0 a .
SFX 0466 0 ach .
SFX 0466 0 aj .
SFX 0466 0 am .
SFX 0466 0 ami .
SFX 0466 0 ej .
SFX 0466 0 om .
SFX 0466 0 omaj .
SFX 0466 0 ow .
SFX 0466 0 u .
SFX 0466 0 y .

SFX 0467 Y 37
SFX 0467 ce ceja ..
SFX 0467 ce cem ..
SFX 0467 ce cemoj ..
SFX 0467 ce cemy ..
SFX 0467 ce cetaj ..
SFX 0467 ce cetej ..
SFX 0467 ce ceće ..
SFX 0467 ce ceš ..
SFX 0467 ce ta ..
SFX 0467 ce tach ..
SFX 0467 ce tachmoj ..
SFX 0467 ce tachmy ..
SFX 0467 ce tachu ..
SFX 0467 ce tacy ..
SFX 0467 ce taj ..
SFX 0467 ce taja ..
SFX 0467 ce tajtaj ..
SFX 0467 ce tajtej ..
SFX 0467 ce tajće ..
SFX 0467 ce tali ..
SFX 0467 ce tam ..
SFX 0467 ce tamoj ..
SFX 0467 ce tamy ..
SFX 0467 ce tanje ..
SFX 0467 ce tany ..
SFX 0467 ce tataj ..
SFX 0467 ce tatej ..
SFX 0467 ce tać ..
SFX 0467 ce taće ..
SFX 0467 ce tał ..
SFX 0467 ce tała ..
SFX 0467 ce tało ..
SFX 0467 ce tałoj ..
SFX 0467 ce taš ..
SFX 0467 ce taštaj ..
SFX 0467 ce taštej ..
SFX 0467 ce tašće ..

SFX 0468 Y 12
SFX 0468 0 ach .
SFX 0468 0 aj .
SFX 0468 0 am .
SFX 0468 0 ami .
SFX 0468 0 ej .
SFX 0468 0 je .
SFX 0468 0 o .
SFX 0468 0 om .
SFX 0468 0 omaj .
SFX 0468 0 ow .
SFX 0468 0 u .
SFX 0468 0 y .

SFX 0469 Y 21
SFX 0469 a acy .
SFX 0469 a am .
SFX 0469 a amoj .
SFX 0469 a amy .
SFX 0469 a any .
SFX 0469 a ataj .
SFX 0469 a atej .
SFX 0469 a ał .
SFX 0469 a ała .
SFX 0469 a ało .
SFX 0469 a ałoj .
SFX 0469 a ej .
SFX 0469 a eja .
SFX 0469 a ejtaj .
SFX 0469 a ejtej .
SFX 0469 a ejće .
SFX 0469 a eli .
SFX 0469 a enje .
SFX 0469 a eć .
SFX 0469 a eće .
SFX 0469 a eš .

SFX 0470 Y 13
SFX 0470 a ach .
SFX 0470 a aj .
SFX 0470 a am .
SFX 0470 a ami .
SFX 0470 a ej .
SFX 0470 a je .
SFX 0470 a o .
SFX 0470 a om .
SFX 0470 a omaj .
SFX 0470 a ow .
SFX 0470 a u .
SFX 0470 a y .
SFX 0470 a yja .

SFX 0471 Y 29
SFX 0471 a ach .
SFX 0471 a achmoj .
SFX 0471 a achmy .
SFX 0471 a achu .
SFX 0471 a aty .
SFX 0471 a ał .
SFX 0471 a ała .
SFX 0471 a ałe .
SFX 0471 a ało .
SFX 0471 a ałoj .
SFX 0471 a ej .
SFX 0471 a eja .
SFX 0471 a eje .
SFX 0471 a ejemoj .
SFX 0471 a ejemy .
SFX 0471 a ejetaj .
SFX 0471 a ejetej .
SFX 0471 a ejeće .
SFX 0471 a eješ .
SFX 0471 a ejtaj .
SFX 0471 a ejtej .
SFX 0471 a eju .
SFX 0471 a ejće .
SFX 0471 a eli .
SFX 0471 a eć .
SFX 0471 a eće .
SFX 0471 a eštaj .
SFX 0471 a eštej .
SFX 0471 a ešće .

SFX 0472 Y 28
SFX 0472 0 ch .
SFX 0472 0 chmoj .
SFX 0472 0 chmy .
SFX 0472 0 chu .
SFX 0472 0 cy .
SFX 0472 0 j .
SFX 0472 0 ja .
SFX 0472 0 jtaj .
SFX 0472 0 jtej .
SFX 0472 0 jće .
SFX 0472 0 li .
SFX 0472 0 moj .
SFX 0472 0 my .
SFX 0472 0 nje .
SFX 0472 0 nješ .
SFX 0472 0 nu .
SFX 0472 0 ny .
SFX 0472 0 taj .
SFX 0472 0 tej .
SFX 0472 0 ć .
SFX 0472 0 će .
SFX 0472 0 ł .
SFX 0472 0 ła .
SFX 0472 0 ło .
SFX 0472 0 łoj .
SFX 0472 0 štaj .
SFX 0472 0 štej .
SFX 0472 0 šće .

SFX 0473 Y 4
SFX 0473 a o .
SFX 0473 a om .
SFX 0473 a omu .
SFX 0473 a u .

SFX 0474 Y 10
SFX 0474 i ja .
SFX 0474 i jach .
SFX 0474 i jam .
SFX 0474 i je .
SFX 0474 i jeho .
SFX 0474 i jemi .
SFX 0474 i jom .
SFX 0474 i jomaj .
SFX 0474 i jow .
SFX 0474 i ju .

SFX 0475 Y 11
SFX 0475 t tach .
SFX 0475 t taj .
SFX 0475 t tam .
SFX 0475 t tami .
SFX 0475 t tej .
SFX 0475 t to .
SFX 0475 t tom .
SFX 0475 t tomaj .
SFX 0475 t tow .
SFX 0475 t ty .
SFX 0475 t će .

SFX 0476 Y 25
SFX 0476 0 ch .
SFX 0476 0 chmoj .
SFX 0476 0 chmy .
SFX 0476 0 chu .
SFX 0476 0 dź .
SFX 0476 0 dźa .
SFX 0476 0 dźtaj .
SFX 0476 0 dźtej .
SFX 0476 0 dźće .
SFX 0476 0 li .
SFX 0476 0 m .
SFX 0476 0 moj .
SFX 0476 0 my .
SFX 0476 0 sć .
SFX 0476 0 taj .
SFX 0476 0 tej .
SFX 0476 0 će .
SFX 0476 0 ł .
SFX 0476 0 ła .
SFX 0476 0 łe .
SFX 0476 0 ło .
SFX 0476 0 łoj .
SFX 0476 0 š .
SFX 0476 0 štaj .
SFX 0476 0 štej .

SFX 0477 Y 29
SFX 0477 ehń ahnje ...
SFX 0477 ehń ahnjech ...
SFX 0477 ehń ahnjechmoj ...
SFX 0477 ehń ahnjechmy ...
SFX 0477 ehń ahnjechu ...
SFX 0477 ehń ahnjemoj ...
SFX 0477 ehń ahnjemy ...
SFX 0477 ehń ahnjetaj ...
SFX 0477 ehń ahnjetej ...
SFX 0477 ehń ahnjeće ...
SFX 0477 ehń ahnješ ...
SFX 0477 ehń ahnješe ...
SFX 0477 ehń ahnještaj ...
SFX 0477 ehń ahnještej ...
SFX 0477 ehń ahnješće ...
SFX 0477 ehń ahnu ...
SFX 0477 ehń ahnyli ...
SFX 0477 ehń ahnyć ...
SFX 0477 ehń ahnył ...
SFX 0477 ehń ahnyła ...
SFX 0477 ehń ahnyło ...
SFX 0477 ehń ahnyłoj ...
SFX 0477 ehń ehnjacy ...
SFX 0477 ehń ehnjenje ...
SFX 0477 ehń ehnjeny ...
SFX 0477 ehń ehnješe ...
SFX 0477 ehń ehńtaj ...
SFX 0477 ehń ehńtej ...
SFX 0477 ehń ehńće ...

SFX 0478 Y 37
SFX 0478 0 a .
SFX 0478 0 ach .
SFX 0478 0 achmoj .
SFX 0478 0 achmy .
SFX 0478 0 achu .
SFX 0478 0 acy .
SFX 0478 0 enje .
SFX 0478 0 eny .
SFX 0478 0 eše .
SFX 0478 0 eštaj .
SFX 0478 0 eštej .
SFX 0478 0 ešće .
SFX 0478 0 i .
SFX 0478 0 ich .
SFX 0478 0 ichmoj .
SFX 0478 0 ichmy .
SFX 0478 0 ichu .
SFX 0478 0 ili .
SFX 0478 0 imoj .
SFX 0478 0 imy .
SFX 0478 0 itaj .
SFX 0478 0 itej .
SFX 0478 0 ić .
SFX 0478 0 iće .
SFX 0478 0 ił .
SFX 0478 0 iła .
SFX 0478 0 iło .
SFX 0478 0 iłoj .
SFX 0478 0 iš .
SFX 0478 0 ištaj .
SFX 0478 0 ištej .
SFX 0478 0 išće .
SFX 0478 0 my .
SFX 0478 0 taj .
SFX 0478 0 tej .
SFX 0478 0 u .
SFX 0478 0 će .

SFX 0479 Y 6
SFX 0479 ta ti ..
SFX 0479 ta to ..
SFX 0479 ta tom ..
SFX 0479 ta tomu ..
SFX 0479 ta tu ..
SFX 0479 ta će ..

SFX 0480 Y 11
SFX 0480 a ach .
SFX 0480 a am .
SFX 0480 a ami .
SFX 0480 a eća .
SFX 0480 a je .
SFX 0480 a o .
SFX 0480 a om .
SFX 0480 a omaj .
SFX 0480 a ow .
SFX 0480 a u .
SFX 0480 a y .
