SpellChecking/Dictionaries/sorbian.dic
Wjertka/0473
njepochmur/0465
njepomróča/0469
njepopřa/0471
njeposmějkoce/0467
njepowě/0476
njepołoskoce/0467
njepraj/0478
njepřeplapoce/0467
njepřećiwja/0469
njepřimikoce/0467
njepřisłuša/0469
njerozjasnja/0469
njerozswětla/0469
njeschadźa/0469
njeskluskoce/0467
njespjerchoce/0467
njeswjerb/0465
njesłuša/0469
njewobdźěl/0478
njewujasnja/0469
njewujědmja/0469
njewumjakoce/0467
njewupapoce/0467
njewupjerchoce/0467
njewuplapoce/0467
njewupowě/0476
njewučinja/0469
njezadyrkoce/0467
njezahorja/0469
njezajakoce/0467
njezakiwkoce/0467
njezamoce/0467
njezamróča/0469
njezapikoce/0467
njezapjerchoce/0467
njezapukoce/0467
njezasapoce/0467
njezaslipoce/0467
njezasmějkoce/0467
njezasłuž/0478
njezatřepoce/0467
njezawrjeskoce/0467
njezašćekoce/0467
njezedźa/0469
njezeschadźa/0469
njezmoce/0467
njezwjesela/0469
pochmur/0465
podp/0461
podsta/0462
pohibuj/0463
pohórš/0464
polyester/0468
pomróča/0469
pomór/0468
pona/0470
popřa/0471
popřesta/0472
porčmješka/0473
posledni/0474
posmějkoce/0467
potřěl/0464
powosta/0472
powě/0476
pozběhuj/0463
połbratr/0466
połoskoce/0467
praj/0478
prehń/0477
presta/0479
prosa/0480
póst/0475
předósta/0472
překlepuj/0463
přepaduj/0463
přeplapoce/0467
přećiwja/0469
přidósta/0472
přimikoce/0467
přisłuša/0469
přizamkuj/0463
rozjasnja/0469
rozpřećel/0464
rozswětla/0469
rozčerć/0464
schadźa/0469
schil/0464
skluskoce/0467
smehń/0477
spjerchoce/0467
spodwol/0464
stowarš/0464
swjerb/0465
słuša/0469
wobdźěl/0478
wopřesta/0472
wopřimuj/0463
wotroj/0464
wottorhuj/0463
wujasnja/0469
wujědmja/0469
wumjakoce/0467
wupal/0464
wupapoce/0467
wupjerchoce/0467
wuplapoce/0467
wupowě/0476
wučinja/0469
wěšenčka/0473
zadyrkoce/0467
zahorja/0469
zajakoce/0467
zakiwkoce/0467
zamróča/0469
zapikoce/0467
zapjerchoce/0467
zapukoce/0467
zasapoce/0467
zaslipoce/0467
zasmějkoce/0467
zasłuž/0478
zatorhuj/0463
zatřepoce/0467
zawal/0464
zawrjeskoce/0467
zašćekoce/0467
zedźa/0469
zeschadźa/0469
zwjesela/0469
